test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-hirnahtama58_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - hirnahtama: # Verb (58) hirnahtama 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     hirnahtama+V+Inf/mA: hirnahtama
     hirnahtama+V+Inf: hirnahtaq
     hirnahtama+V+Act+PrfPrc: hirnahtanuq
     hirnahtama+V+Pss+PrfPrc: hirnahtõt

     hirnahtama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hirnahta
     hirnahtama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [hirnahtat, hirnahtadõq]
     hirnahtama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hirnahtas
     hirnahtama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: hirnahtamiq
     hirnahtama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [hirnahtatiq, hirnahtadõq]
     hirnahtama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: hirnahtasõq
     hirnahtama+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: hirnahta
     hirnahtama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: hirnahti
     hirnahtama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [hirnahtit, hirnahtidõq]
     hirnahtama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: hirnaht'
     hirnahtama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: hirnahtimiq
     hirnahtama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [hirnahtitiq, hirnahtidõq]
     hirnahtama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [hirnahtiq, hirnahtivaq]

     hirnahtama+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hirnahtõdas

     hirnahtama+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: hirnahtav

     hirnahtama+V+Jus: hirnahtaguq
